Wyoming statutes. Title 29 Liens
Chapter 6 Federal Lien Registration

Cross references. —

For authority of county clerk relative to filing or recording liens or claims in favor of the United States, see §

18-3-402

.

Law reviews. —

See note, “Federal Tax Liens in Mortgage Foreclosures,” 13 Wyo. L.J. 146 (1959).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

72 Am. Jur. 2d State and Local Taxation §§ 798-805.